Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4804
Hearing.

Upon the filing of a petition for emancipation, the court shall fix a time for a hearing on the petition. The hearing shall be held not less than forty-five days and not more than sixty days after the filing of such petition unless any party for good cause shown requests a continuance of the hearing or all parties agree to a continuance.

Laws 2018, LB714, § 4.